Washington statutes.
RCW 5.56.080

To whom attachment directed—Execution.

Such attachment may be directed to the sheriff or any deputy of any county in which the witness may be found, and shall be executed in the same manner as a warrant; and the fees of the officer for issuing and serving the same shall be paid by the person against whom the same was issued, unless he or she shows reasonable cause, to the satisfaction of the judge, for his or her omission to attend; in which case the party requiring such attachment shall pay all such costs.

[ 1987 c 202 s 126; 1891 c 19 s 3; RRS s 1222.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: Cf. CR 45(f).

Reviser's note: Preliminary language of 1891 c 19 s 3 reads as follows: "The following section is enacted to follow section 400 of the said Code of 1881 [RCW 5.56.070], as that section shall be numbered in the code of procedure of this state:".

Intent—1987 c 202: See note following RCW 2.04.190.